Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB698.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the BPA-free Container Products Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"BPA." Bisphenol A."Container." A food or beverage package, parcel or other vessel intended for use in storing, heating or serving liquids or solids for consumption by the general population.Section 3. BPA-free food and beverage containers.123456789101112131415 (a) Prohibition.--A person or entity may not manufacture, sell or distribute any container that contains BPA at a level above 0.1 parts per billion.(b) Manufacturer standards.--The following standards apply to manufacturers' use and replacement of BPA:(1) A manufacturer shall use the least toxic alternative when replacing BPA in containers in accordance with this section.(2) A manufacturer may not, under this section, replace BPA with carcinogens rated by the United States Environmental Protection Agency as A, B or C carcinogens or substances listed as known or likely carcinogens, known to be human carcinogens, likely to be human carcinogens or suggestive of being human carcinogens, as described by the United States Environmental Protection Agency in the Integrated Risk Information System.(3) A manufacturer may not, under this section, replace BPA with reproductive toxicants that cause birth defects, reproductive harm or developmental harm, as identified by the United States Environmental Protection Agency.Section 4. Violation of Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law.A violation of section 3 constitutes unfair methods of competition and unfair or deceptive acts or practices within the meaning of section 2(4) of the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, and shall be subject to the enforcement provisions, civil penalties and private rights of action contained in that act.Section 5. Effective date.20250HB0698PN0714 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0698PN0714 - 3 - 1